Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1066.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1512.2. Student Fitness Assessment.--(a) Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, and continuing each school year thereafter, a school district, charter school and cyber charter school shall administer a student fitness assessment aligned with the national physical fitness testing program, known as the Presidential Fitness Test, established and maintained by the President's Council on Sports, Fitness and Nutrition, or a successor program.(b) The assessment shall be administered according to 1234567891011121314151617181920 Presidential Executive Order 14327, as published in 65 Fed. Reg. 249, 37993 (August 6, 2025), and any related Federal guidance and interpretative materials issued under the Presidential Executive Order or its successor.(c) The assessment shall be conducted within the regular program of health, safety and physical education and may not be used as a condition of promotion or graduation.(d) The Department of Education shall issue guidelines and materials to ensure uniform administration of the assessment and may establish recognition for student achievement consistent with national benchmarks.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1066PN1249 - 2 - 123456789101112